Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 9
FOREIGN LIMITED PARTNERSHIPS

Editor's note:

This part 9 was added in 1981. This part 9 was repealed and reenacted in 2003, effective July 1, 2004, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 9 prior to 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

7-62-901. Law governing foreign limited partnership or foreign limited liability limited partnership. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2247, § 144, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 1446, § 146, effective July 1.

7-62-902. Authority to transact business or conduct activities required.

Part 8 of article 90 of this title, providing for the transaction of business or the conduct of activities by foreign entities, applies to foreign limited partnerships and foreign limited liability limited partnerships.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2247, § 144, effective July 1, 2004.

7-62-903. Registered agent - service of process.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, applies to foreign limited partnerships.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2247, § 144, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1446, § 147, effective July 1.